Wisconsin, session 2025, SB650.
do enact as follows:SB650,11Section 1. 165.27 of the statutes is created to read:SB650,2,102165.27 Transnational repression training, prevention, and 3awareness. (1) In this section, “transnational repression” means an action taken 4by a person acting as an agent of or on behalf of a foreign government or foreign 5terrorist organization, outside of the jurisdiction of the government or organization, 6with the intent to harass, intimidate, silence, punish, or otherwise impose the 7foreign government’s or foreign terrorist organization’s control, preferences, 8viewpoints, or laws upon a dissident; exile; activist; journalist; political opponent; 9member of a religious, ethnic, or political minority group; or citizen of another 10country due to their political view.SB650,2,1111(2) The department of justice shall do all of the following:SB650,3,21(a) Develop a training program for law enforcement officers on how to identify 2and respond to transnational repression.SB650,3,53(b) Maintain a list of countries and foreign terrorist organizations that 4perpetrate transnational repression frequently, including how the countries and 5organizations perpetrate transnational repression.SB650,3,76(c) Develop best practices for preventing transnational repression within local 7communities.SB650,3,118(d) Develop a public awareness campaign to help individuals identify and 9report possible cases of transnational repression and to collect examples of cases 10from the public. The public awareness campaign shall include institutions of higher 11education with foreign student populations.SB650,3,1312(e) Create a digital portal on the department’s website for reporting suspected 13cases of transnational repression.SB650,3,1614(3) The department of justice shall submit a report annually to the 15appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) detailing 16identified cases of transnational repression.SB650,217Section 2. 939.64 of the statutes is created to read:SB650,3,2218939.64 Penalty enhancer; crime committed as act of transnational 19repression. (1) If a person commits, or solicits, conspires, or attempts under s. 20939.30, 939.31, or 939.32 to commit, a crime under chs. 939 to 948, the 21classification for the underlying crime is increased as provided under sub. (2) if all 22of the following apply:SB650,3,2423(a) The action is taken by a person acting as an agent of or on behalf of a 24foreign government or foreign terrorist organization.SB650,4,51(b) The action is taken with the intent to harass, intimidate, silence, punish, 2or otherwise impose the foreign government’s or foreign terrorist organization’s 3control, preferences, viewpoints, or laws upon a dissident; exile; activist; journalist; 4political opponent; member of a religious, ethnic, or political minority group; or 5citizen of another country due to their political view.SB650,4,86(2) (a) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a Class B to I felony, the person 7is guilty of a felony that is one classification higher than the classification of the 8underlying crime.SB650,4,109(b) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a Class A misdemeanor, the 10person is guilty of a Class I felony.SB650,4,1311(c) If the underlying crime under sub. (1) is a misdemeanor other than a Class 12A misdemeanor, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor that is one classification 13higher than the classification of the underlying crime.SB650,4,1614(3) This section provides for the enhancement of the penalties applicable for 15the underlying crime. The court shall direct that the trier of fact find a special 16verdict as to all of the elements specified in sub. (1).SB650,317Section 3. 946.685 of the statutes is created to read:SB650,4,2318946.685 Illegally enforcing foreign laws. (1) No person may intentionally 19engage in the prevention, detection, investigation, monitoring, surveilling, or 20prosecution of an offense under the law or rule of a foreign government or foreign 21terrorist organization at the direction of the foreign government or foreign terrorist 22organization without the prior approval of the federal government or a Wisconsin 23law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.SB650,5,524(2) A person who violates sub. (1) is guilty of a Class E felony. If a person is 1convicted of a violation of sub. (1), the court shall impose a bifurcated sentence 2under s. 973.01. The term of confinement in prison portion of the bifurcated 3sentence shall be at least 3 years, and the person shall be fined at least $10,000. 4Otherwise the penalties for the crime apply, subject to any applicable penalty 5enhancement.SB650,46Section 4. 973.01 (2) (c) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB650,5,87973.01 (2) (c) 2. a. Sections 939.621, 939.623, 939.632, 939.635, 939.64, 8939.645, 946.42 (4), 961.442, 961.46, and 961.49.SB650,5,99